en: Home Heating Oil
xx: Home Heating Oil
cs: Topný olej na doma
da: Fyringsolie til hjemmet
de: Heizöl für den Haushalt
es: Gasóleo para calefacción
fr: Fioul
it: Gasolio per riscaldamento
ja: 家庭用暖房油
nl: Stookolie
no: Fyringsolje
pl: Olej opałowy
pt: Óleo para aquecedor doméstico
ru: Топливо для отопления дома
sv: Villaolja
tr: Ev Isıtma Yağları

en: Kerosene
xx: Kerosene
cs: Petrolej
da: Petroleum
de: Kerosin
es: Queroseno
fr: Kérosène
it: Kerosene
ja: 灯油
nl: Kerosine
no: Parafin
pl: Nafta
pt: Querosene
ru: Керосин
sv: Fotogen
tr: Kerosen

en: Clear Kerosene
xx: Clear Kerosene
cs: Nebarvený petrolej
da: Klar petroleum
de: Klares Kerosin
es: Queroseno transparente
fr: Kérosène incolore
it: Kerosene trasparente
ja: 白灯油
nl: Kleurloze kerosine
no: Klar parafin
pl: Nafta przezroczysta
pt: Querosene puro
ru: Очищенный керосин
sv: Genomskinlig fotogen
tr: Temiz Kerosen

en: Dyed Kerosene
xx: Dyed Kerosene
cs: Obarvený petrolej
da: Farvet petroleum
de: Gefärbtes Kerosin
es: Queroseno con colorantes
fr: Kérosène coloré
it: Kerosene colorato
ja: 色付き灯油
nl: Gekleurde kerosine
no: Farget parafin
pl: Nafta barwiona
pt: Querosene adulterado
ru: Окрашенный керосин
sv: Färgsatt fotogen
tr: Boyalı Kerosen

en: Propane
xx: Propane
cs: Propan
da: Propan
de: Propan
es: Propano
fr: Propane
it: Propano
ja: プロパン
nl: Propaan
no: Propan
pl: Propan
pt: Propano
ru: Пропан
sv: Propan
tr: Propan

en: Fuel Containers & Tanks
xx: Fuel Containers & Tanks
cs: Nádrže a nádoby na palivo
da: Benzinbeholdere
de: Brennstoffbehälter & -tanks
es: Depósitos y tanques de combustible
fr: Conteneurs et citernes pour combustible
it: Serbatoi e contenitori per carburante
ja: 燃料容器・タンク
nl: Gastanks
no: Brennstoffkanner og -tanker
pl: Zbiorniki paliwa
pt: Contêineres e tanques de combustível
ru: Контейнеры для топлива
sv: Bränslekärl och -tankar
tr: Yakıt Kapları ve Tankları

en: Hardware Accessories
xx: Hardware Accessories
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo – příslušenství
da: Isenkram – tilbehør
de: Bauzubehör
es: Accesorios de bricolaje
fr: Accessoires de quincaillerie
it: Accessori ferramenta
ja: DIY小物類
nl: Bouwbeslag
no: Jernvaretilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do sprzętu
pt: Acessórios para ferragens
ru: Строительные расходные материалы
sv: Tillbehör till järnvaror
tr: Tesisat Aksesuarları

en: Brackets & Reinforcement Braces
xx: Brackets & Reinforcement Braces
cs: Konzoly a výztuhy
da: Beslag
de: Halterungen
es: Soportes y travesaños
fr: Supports et équerres de renfort
it: Staffe e supporti di rinforzo
ja: ブラケット
nl: Beugels
no: Braketter og forsterkningsskinner
pl: Wsporniki
pt: Suportes de parede
ru: Кронштейны
sv: Vinkeljärn
tr: Braketler ve Takviye Bağlantıları

en: Cabinet Hardware
xx: Cabinet Hardware
cs: Nábytkové kování
da: Skabstilbehør
de: Schrankbauteile
es: Ferretería para armarios
fr: Matériel pour meubles de cuisine, Accessoire pour meuble (taquet, équerre, patte, charnière, vis spécifiquement dédiées), Compas pour meuble, Loquetaux, Accessoire de pose ou d'accrochage (dévidoir, dérouleur, distributeur, support...), Bande de chant, Bandeau de four, Crémaillère, Fileur, Joue de finition, Kit coulissant, Panneau de meuble, Plinthe de meuble, Pieds de meuble, Piétement de meuble (bureau, siège, table...), Piétement de table, Quincaillerie de meuble, Raccord de meubles modulaires, Support mural d'accrochage, Tasseau, Tringle à penderie, revêtement de meuble (portes de placard, plan de travail...), Socle de caisson, Porte battante de meuble, Tréteau, Crédence, Dosseret
it: Articoli per mobiletti
ja: キャビネット用品・取付金具
nl: Beslag voor kastjes
no: Skapdeler
pl: Wyposażenie do szaf
pt: Ferragens para armários embutidos
ru: Оборудование для шкафов
sv: Skåpbeslag
tr: Dolap Hırdavatları

en: Cabinet & Furniture Keyhole Escutcheons
xx: Cabinet & Furniture Keyhole Escutcheons
cs: Ozdobné štítky klíčových dírek na skřínky a nábytek
da: Nøglehulsbeslag til skabe og møbler
de: Schlüssellochverzierungen für Schränke
es: Escudos para cerraduras de armarios y muebles
fr: Entrées de serrure pour armoires et autres meubles
it: Bocchette per serrature di armadietti e mobili
ja: キャビネット・家具用鍵穴装飾プレート
nl: Sleutelgatplaatjes voor kasten en meubels
no: Nøkkelhullbeslag til skap og møbler
pl: Szyldy do zamków w szafkach
pt: Fechaduras decorativas para armários e móveis
ru: Накладки на замочные скважины для мебели
sv: Nyckelhålsbeslag för skåp och möbler
tr: Dolap ve Mobilya Anahtar Deliği Kapakları

en: Cabinet Backplates
xx: Cabinet Backplates
cs: Nábytkové podložky kování
da: Skabsbagplader
de: Schrankbeschläge
es: Placas soporte para tiradores de armarios
fr: Plaques pour poignées de meubles de cuisine
it: Piastre posteriori mobiletti
ja: キャビネット取付用バックプレート
nl: Achterwanden voor kastjes
no: Bakplater til skap
pl: Szyldy do szaf
pt: Puxadores de armários embutidos
ru: Задние щитки для шкафов
sv: Bakplattor för skåphandtag
tr: Dolap Arka Levhaları

en: Cabinet Catches
xx: Cabinet Catches
cs: Nábytkové západky
da: Skabsstoppere
de: Schrankscharniere
es: Cierres de armarios
fr: Crochets de portes pour meubles de cuisine
it: Cerniere per mobili
ja: キャビネットキャッチ
nl: Kastgrepen
no: Skaphasper
pl: Zatrzaski do szaf
pt: Ferrolhos de armários embutidos
ru: Защелки для шкафов
sv: Spärranordningar för skåpdörrar
tr: Dolap Kapak Mandalları

en: Cabinet Doors
xx: Cabinet Doors
cs: Nábytková dvířka
da: Skabsdøre
de: Schranktüren
es: Puertas de armarios
fr: Portes pour meubles de cuisine
it: Ante per mobiletti
ja: キャビネット扉
nl: Kastdeuren
no: Skapdører
pl: Drzwi do szaf
pt: Portas de armários embutidos
ru: Двери для шкафов
sv: Skåpdörrar
tr: Dolap Kapakları

en: Cabinet Knobs & Handles
xx: Cabinet Knobs & Handles
cs: Nábytkové úchytky a madla
da: Skabslågegreb og -håndtag
de: Schrankknäufe & -griffe
es: Pomos y picaportes de armarios
fr: Poignées et boutons de portes pour meubles de cuisine, Bouton de meuble, Poignée de meuble
it: Pomelli/maniglie mobiletti
ja: キャビネット取っ手
nl: Kastknoppen en kastgrepen
no: Skapknotter og -håndtak
pl: Gałki i uchwyty do szaf
pt: Maçanetas e alças para armários embutidos
ru: Рукоятки и ручки для шкафов
sv: Skåphandtag
tr: Dolap Kulp ve Tutamakları

en: Casters
xx: Casters
cs: Pojezdová kolečka
da: Møbelhjul
de: Laufrollen
es: Ruedas
fr: Roulettes
it: Rotelle
ja: キャスター
nl: Zwenkwielen
no: Møbeltrinser
pl: Kółka do mebli
pt: Rodízios
ru: Колесики
sv: Hjul
tr: Mobilya Tekerlekleri

en: Chain\, Wire & Rope
xx: Chain\, Wire & Rope
cs: Řetězy\, dráty a provazy
da: Kæder\, wirer og reb
de: Ketten\, Drähte & Seile
es: Cadenas\, alambre y cuerda
fr: Chaînes\, câbles et cordes
it: Corde\, fili e catene
ja: チェーン・ワイヤー
nl: Ketting\, draad en touw
no: Kjetting\, kabler og tau
pl: Łańcuchy\, druty i sznury
pt: Correntes\, cabos e cordas
ru: Цепи\, верёвки и канаты
sv: Kedja\, vajer och rep
tr: Zincir\, Kablo ve İp

en: Bungee Cords
xx: Bungee Cords
cs: Upínací gumy
da: Blækspruttestropper
de: Spanngummis
es: Cuerdas elásticas
fr: Sangles élastiques
it: Corde elastiche
ja: フック付伸縮ロープ
nl: Elastische koorden
no: Strikkbånd
pl: Linki elastyczne
pt: Cordas elásticas
ru: Амортизирующие тросы
sv: Bagagestroppar
tr: Esnek Halatlar

en: Chains
xx: Chains
cs: Řetězy
da: Kæder
de: Ketten
es: Cadenas
fr: Chaînes
it: Catene
ja: チェーン
nl: Kettingen
no: Kjettinger
pl: Łańcuchy
pt: Correntes
ru: Цепи
sv: Kedjor
tr: Zincirler

en: Pull Chains
xx: Pull Chains
cs: Řetízky
da: Kæder til træk og slip-toiletter
de: Zugschalterketten und -kordeln
es: Tiradores de cadena
fr: Chaînettes
it: Catenelle
ja: スイッチ用チェーン・コード
nl: Treksnoeren
no: Lenkebrytere
pl: Łańcuszki do włączników
pt: Correntes de puxar
ru: Тяговые цепи
sv: Kedjor till dragströmbrytare
tr: Çekme Zincirleri

en: Ropes & Hardware Cable
xx: Ropes & Hardware Cable
cs: Lana a kabely
da: Reb
de: Seile
es: Sogas y cuerdas metálicas
fr: Cordes et câbles de construction
it: Cavi e funi
ja: ロープ
nl: Touw
no: Tau
pl: Liny
pt: Corda
ru: Канаты
sv: Rep
tr: Halatlar